Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-249
Officers; removal; vacancies; how filled.

A city of the primary class may provide for removing officers of the city for misconduct, except as otherwise provided in Chapter 15, and may provide for filling vacancies in any elective office as provided in sections 32-568 and 32-569.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XLIX, p. 140;

R.S.1913, § 4459;

C.S.1922, § 3844;

C.S.1929, § 15-247;

R.S.1943, § 15-249;

Laws 1961, c. 37, § 1, p. 163;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 480.

Provisions of general election law for filling vacancies apply to alderman where no ordinance is inconsistent therewith, and appointee holds until successor is chosen at next general election. State ex rel. Castle v. Schroeder, 79 Neb. 759, 113 N.W. 192 (1907).